test/src/dict-gt-yamls/U-sanit_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:
  Noun - rapu: # ok APINA
    rapu+N+Sg+Nom:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Gen:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Acc:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Ill:  rapun
    rapu+N+Sg+Loc:  rapust
    rapu+N+Sg+Com:  rapuin
    rapu+N+Sg+Abe:  raputtáá
    rapu+N+Ess:  rapun
    rapu+N+Par:  rapud
    rapu+N+Pl+Nom:  rapuh
    rapu+N+Pl+Gen:  rapui
    rapu+N+Pl+Acc:  rapuid
    rapu+N+Pl+Ill:  rapuid
    rapu+N+Pl+Loc:  rapuin
    rapu+N+Pl+Com:  rapuiguin
    rapu+N+Pl+Abe:  rapuittáá

  Noun - kaasu: # ok APINA
    kaasu+N+Sg+Nom:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Gen:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Acc:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Ill:  kaasun
    kaasu+N+Sg+Loc:  kaasust
    kaasu+N+Sg+Com:  kaasuin
    kaasu+N+Sg+Abe:  kaasuttáá
    kaasu+N+Ess:  kaasun
    kaasu+N+Par:  kaasud
    kaasu+N+Pl+Nom:  kaasuh
    kaasu+N+Pl+Gen:  kaasui
    kaasu+N+Pl+Acc:  kaasuid
    kaasu+N+Pl+Ill:  kaasuid
    kaasu+N+Pl+Loc:  kaasuin
    kaasu+N+Pl+Com:  kaasuiguin
    kaasu+N+Pl+Abe:  kaasuittáá

  Noun - liidu: # ok APINA
    liidu+N+Sg+Nom:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Gen:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Acc:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Ill:  liidun
    liidu+N+Sg+Loc:  liidust
    liidu+N+Sg+Com:  liiduin
    liidu+N+Sg+Abe:  liiduttáá
    liidu+N+Ess:  liidun
    liidu+N+Par:  liidud
    liidu+N+Pl+Nom:  liiduh
    liidu+N+Pl+Gen:  liidui
    liidu+N+Pl+Acc:  liiduid
    liidu+N+Pl+Ill:  liiduid
    liidu+N+Pl+Loc:  liiduin
    liidu+N+Pl+Com:  liiduiguin
    liidu+N+Pl+Abe:  liiduittáá

  Noun - ruusu: # ok APINA
    ruusu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruusun
    ruusu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruusust
    ruusu+N+Sg+Com:  ruusuin
    ruusu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruusuttáá
    ruusu+N+Ess:  ruusun
    ruusu+N+Par:  ruusud
    ruusu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruusuh
    ruusu+N+Pl+Gen:  ruusui
    ruusu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruusuid
    ruusu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruusuid
    ruusu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruusuin
    ruusu+N+Pl+Com:  ruusuiguin
    ruusu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruusuittáá

  Noun - hersku: # ok HERSKU
    hersku+N+Sg+Nom:  hersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Gen:  heersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Acc:  heersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Ill:  heerskun
    hersku+N+Sg+Loc:  heerskust
    hersku+N+Sg+Com:  herskoin
    hersku+N+Sg+Abe:  heˊrskuttáá
    hersku+N+Ess:  herskun
    hersku+N+Par:  herskud
    hersku+N+Pl+Nom:  heerskuh
    hersku+N+Pl+Gen: [heerskui, heˊrskui]
    hersku+N+Pl+Acc:  heerskuid
    hersku+N+Pl+Ill:  herskoid
    hersku+N+Pl+Loc:  heerskuin
    hersku+N+Pl+Com:  heˊrskuiguin
    hersku+N+Pl+Abe:  heˊrskuittáá

  Noun - árppu: # ok HERSKU
    árppu+N+Sg+Nom:  árppu
    árppu+N+Sg+Gen:  áárpu
    árppu+N+Sg+Acc:  áárpu
    árppu+N+Sg+Ill:  áárpun
    árppu+N+Sg+Loc:  áárpust
    árppu+N+Sg+Com:  árppoin
    árppu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊrputtáá
    árppu+N+Ess:  árppun
    árppu+N+Par:  árppud
    árppu+N+Pl+Nom:  áárpuh
    árppu+N+Pl+Gen: [áárpui, áˊrpui]
    árppu+N+Pl+Acc:  áárpuid
    árppu+N+Pl+Ill:  árppoid
    árppu+N+Pl+Loc:  áárpuin
    árppu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊrpuiguin
    árppu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊrpuittáá

  Noun - párkku: # ok LAAVU
    párkku+N+Sg+Nom:  párkku
    párkku+N+Sg+Gen:  páárhu
    párkku+N+Sg+Acc:  páárhu
    párkku+N+Sg+Ill:  páárkun
    párkku+N+Sg+Loc:  páárhust
    párkku+N+Sg+Com:  párhoin
    párkku+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊrhuttáá
    párkku+N+Ess:  párkkun
    párkku+N+Par:  párkkud
    párkku+N+Pl+Nom:  páárhuh
    párkku+N+Pl+Gen: [páárhui, páˊrhui]
    párkku+N+Pl+Acc:  páárhuid
    párkku+N+Pl+Ill:  párhoid
    párkku+N+Pl+Loc:  páárhuin
    párkku+N+Pl+Com:  páˊrhuiguin
    párkku+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊrhuittáá

  Noun - rávsku: # ok HERSKU
    rávsku+N+Sg+Nom:  rávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávskun
    rávsku+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávskust
    rávsku+N+Sg+Com:  rávskoin
    rávsku+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊvskuttáá
    rávsku+N+Ess:  rávskun
    rávsku+N+Par:  rávskud
    rávsku+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávskuh
    rávsku+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávskui, ráˊvskui]
    rávsku+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávskuid
    rávsku+N+Pl+Ill:  rávskoid
    rávsku+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávskuin
    rávsku+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊvskuiguin
    rávsku+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊvskuittáá

  Noun - čáittu: # ok HERSKU
    čáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  čáittu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  čááitu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Acc:  čááitu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  čááitun
    čáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  čááitust
    čáittu+N+Sg+Com:  čáittoin
    čáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  čáˊituttáá
    čáittu+N+Ess:  čáittun
    čáittu+N+Par:  čáittud
    čáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  čááituh
    čáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [čááitui, čáˊitui]
    čáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  čááituid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  čáittoid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  čááituin
    čáittu+N+Pl+Com:  čáˊituiguin
    čáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  čáˊituittáá

  Noun - kállu: # ok KALLU
    kállu+N+Sg+Nom:  kállu
    kállu+N+Sg+Gen:  kááḷu
    kállu+N+Sg+Acc:  kááḷu
    kállu+N+Sg+Ill:  kááḷun
    kállu+N+Sg+Loc:  kááḷust
    kállu+N+Sg+Com:  kálloin
    kállu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊḷuttáá
    kállu+N+Ess:  kállun
    kállu+N+Par:  kállud
    kállu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááḷuh
    kállu+N+Pl+Gen: [kááḷui, káˊḷui]
    kállu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááḷuid
    kállu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálloid
    kállu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááḷuin
    kállu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊḷuiguin
    kállu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊḷuittáá

  Noun - pánnu: # ok KALLU
    pánnu+N+Sg+Nom:  pánnu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Gen:  pááṇu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Acc:  pááṇu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Ill:  pááṇun
    pánnu+N+Sg+Loc:  pááṇust
    pánnu+N+Sg+Com:  pánnoin
    pánnu+N+Sg+Abe:  páṇuttáá
    pánnu+N+Ess:  pánnun
    pánnu+N+Par:  pánnud
    pánnu+N+Pl+Nom:  pááṇuh
    pánnu+N+Pl+Gen: [pááṇui, páˊṇui]
    pánnu+N+Pl+Acc:  pááṇuid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Ill:  pánnoid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Loc:  pááṇuin
    pánnu+N+Pl+Com:  páˊṇuiguin
    pánnu+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊṇuittáá

  Noun - muállu: # ok VUAGGU
    muállu+N+Sg+Nom:  muálˊlu
    muállu+N+Sg+Gen:  muáḷu
    muállu+N+Sg+Acc:  muáḷu
    muállu+N+Sg+Ill:  muáḷun
    muállu+N+Sg+Loc:  muáḷust
    muállu+N+Sg+Com:  muálˊloin
    muállu+N+Sg+Abe:  muáˊḷuttáá
    muállu+N+Ess:  muálˊlun
    muállu+N+Par:  muálˊlud
    muállu+N+Pl+Nom:  muáḷuh
    muállu+N+Pl+Gen:  [muáḷui, muáˊḷui]
    muállu+N+Pl+Acc:  muáḷuid
    muállu+N+Pl+Ill:  muálˊloid
    muállu+N+Pl+Loc:  muáḷuin
    muállu+N+Pl+Com:  muáˊluiguin
    muállu+N+Pl+Abe:  muáˊluittáá

  Noun - puállu: # ok KALLU
    puállu+N+Sg+Nom:  puálˊlu
    puállu+N+Sg+Gen:  puáḷu
    puállu+N+Sg+Acc:  puáḷu
    puállu+N+Sg+Ill:  puáḷun
    puállu+N+Sg+Loc:  puáḷust
    puállu+N+Sg+Com:  puálˊloin
    puállu+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊḷuttáá
    puállu+N+Ess:  puálˊlun
    puállu+N+Par:  puálˊlud
    puállu+N+Pl+Nom:  puáḷuh
    puállu+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáḷui, puáˊḷui]
    puállu+N+Pl+Acc:  puáḷuid
    puállu+N+Pl+Ill:  puálˊloid
    puállu+N+Pl+Loc:  puáḷuin
    puállu+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊḷuiguin
    puállu+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊḷuittáá

  Noun - juáhu: # ok LAAVU
    juáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  juáhu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  juáṿu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  juáhun
    juáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  juáṿust
    juáhu+N+Sg+Com:  juávvoin
    juáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  juáˊṿuttáá
    juáhu+N+Ess:  juáhun
    juáhu+N+Par:  juáhud
    juáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  juáṿuh
    juáhu+N+Pl+Gen: [juáṿui, juáˊvui]
    juáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  juáṿuid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  juávvoid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  juáṿuin
    juáhu+N+Pl+Com:  juáˊvuiguin
    juáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  juáˊvuittáá

  Noun - mááhu: # ok LAAVU
    mááhu+N+Sg+Nom:  mááhu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Gen:  mááṿu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Sg+Loc:  mááṿust
    mááhu+N+Sg+Com:  mávvoin
    mááhu+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊṿuttáá
    mááhu+N+Ess:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Par:  mááhud
    mááhu+N+Pl+Nom:  mááṿuh
    mááhu+N+Pl+Gen: [mááṿui, máṿui]
    mááhu+N+Pl+Acc:  mááṿuid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Ill:  mávvoid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Loc:  mááṿuin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Com:  máˊṿuiguin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊṿuittáá

  Noun - ruáhu: # ok KALLU
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruáhu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruáṿu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruáṿu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruáhun
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruáṿust
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávvoin
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruáˊvuttáá
    ruáhu+N+Ess:  ruáhun
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruáṿuh
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruáṿui, ruáˊvui]
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruáṿuid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávvoid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruáṿuin
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Com:  ruáˊvuiguin
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruáˊvuittáá

  Noun - uáinu: # ok KIAINU
    uáinu+N+Sg+Nom:  uáiˊnu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Gen:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Acc:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Ill:  uáinun
    uáinu+N+Sg+Loc:  uáinust
    uáinu+N+Sg+Com:  uáiˊnoin
    uáinu+N+Sg+Abe:  uáˊinuttáá
    uáinu+N+Ess:  uáiˊnun
    uáinu+N+Par:  uáiˊnud
    uáinu+N+Pl+Nom:  uáinuh
    uáinu+N+Pl+Gen: [uáinui, uáˊinui]
    uáinu+N+Pl+Acc:  uáinuid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Ill:  uáiˊnoid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Loc:  uáinuin
    uáinu+N+Pl+Com:  uáˊinuiguin
    uáinu+N+Pl+Abe:  uáˊinuittáá


  Noun - kuáivu: # ok KIAINU
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáiˊvu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáivun
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuáivust
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Com:  kuáiˊvoin
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊivuttáá
    kuáivu+N+Ess:  kuáiˊvun
    kuáivu+N+Par:  kuáiˊvud
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuáivuh
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Gen: [kuáivui, kuáˊivui]
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuáivuid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáiˊvoid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuáivuin
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊivuiguin
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊivuittáá

  Noun - kiäinu: # ok KIAINU
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäiˊnu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Acc:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäinun
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäinust
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Com:  kiäiˊnoin
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊinuttáá
    kiäinu+N+Ess:  kiäiˊnun
    kiäinu+N+Par:  kiäiˊnud
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäinuh
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Gen: [kiäinui, kiäˊinui]
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäinuid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäiˊnoid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäinuin
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊinuiguin
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊinuittáá
    
  Noun - vuábdu: # ok KIAINU
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuábˊdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuábdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuábdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuábdun
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuábdust
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Com:  vuábˊdoin
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊbduttáá
    vuábdu+N+Ess:  vuábˊdun
    vuábdu+N+Par:  vuábˊdud
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuábduh
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Gen: [vuábdui, vuáˊbdui]
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuábduid
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuábˊdoid
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuábduin
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊbduiguin
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊbduittáá

  Noun - luándu: # ok KIAINU
    luándu+N+Sg+Nom:  luánˊdu
    luándu+N+Sg+Gen:  luándu
    luándu+N+Sg+Acc:  luándu
    luándu+N+Sg+Ill:  luándun
    luándu+N+Sg+Loc:  luándust
    luándu+N+Sg+Com:  luánˊdoin
    luándu+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊnduttáá
    luándu+N+Ess:  luánˊdun
    luándu+N+Par:  luánˊdud
    luándu+N+Pl+Nom:  luánduh
    luándu+N+Pl+Gen: [luándui, luáˊndui]
    luándu+N+Pl+Acc:  luánduid
    luándu+N+Pl+Ill:  luánˊdoid
    luándu+N+Pl+Loc:  luánduin
    luándu+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊnduiguin
    luándu+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊnduittáá

  Noun - nuárju: # ok KIAINU
    nuárju+N+Sg+Nom:  nuárˊju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Gen:  nuárju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Ill:  nuárjun
    nuárju+N+Sg+Loc:  nuárjust
    nuárju+N+Sg+Com:  nuárˊjoin
    nuárju+N+Sg+Abe:  nuáˊrjuttáá
    nuárju+N+Ess:  nuárˊjun
    nuárju+N+Par:  nuárˊjud
    nuárju+N+Pl+Nom:  nuárjuh
    nuárju+N+Pl+Gen: [nuárjui, nuáˊrjui]
    nuárju+N+Pl+Acc:  nuárjuid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Ill:  nuárˊjoid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Loc:  nuárjuin
    nuárju+N+Pl+Com:  nuáˊrjuiguin
    nuárju+N+Pl+Abe:  nuáˊrjuittáá

  Noun - kuávlu: # ok KIAINU
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávˊlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávlun
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávlust
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊloin
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvluttáá
    kuávlu+N+Ess:  kuávˊlun
    kuávlu+N+Par:  kuávˊlud
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávluh
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávlui, kuáˊvlui]
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávluid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊloid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávluin
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvluiguin
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvluittáá
